src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AN_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dlán - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AN_STEM_2

     dlán+V+Interr+Past: dláanaa
     dlán+V+Indir+Past: dláanaan
     dlán+V+Rel+Evid: dláanaas
     dlán+V+Past+NonFact: dláanaa.ang
     dlán+V+Cert+Pres: dláanʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+Cert+Past: dláanʼahlanggan
     dlán+V+Cert+Past+Hab: dláanʼahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+Cert+Rel: dláanʼahlans
     dlán+V+Ints+Past: dláanaaʼahlang
     dlán+V+Cont: dláanaaʼahlanggaa
     dlán+V+Ctfact+Pres: dláanaaʼahlanggang
     dlán+V+Rflx: dláanʼahl
